Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.130

Health professional loan repayment and scholarship program fund.

(1) Any funds appropriated by the legislature for the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program, the nurse educator loan repayment program, the forensic pathology loan repayment program, or any other public or private funds intended for loan repayments or scholarships under these programs shall be placed in the account created by this section.

(2) The health professional loan repayment and scholarship program fund is created in custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the program shall be deposited into the fund. Only the office, or its designee, may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

[ 2023 c 442 s 9; 2022 c 276 s 8; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 212; 1991 c 332 s 28.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 442: See note following RCW 28B.115.020.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.